Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1174.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Capital Budget Project Itemization Act of 2026-2027.Section 2. Total authorizations.(a) Public improvements.--The total authorization for the additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects itemized in section 3 and to be acquired or 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 constructed by the Department of General Services, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $32,314,071,000.(b) Furniture and equipment.--The total authorization for the additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition of original movable furniture and equipment to complete public improvement projects itemized in section 4 and to be acquired by the Department of General Services, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $917,194,000.(c) Transportation assistance.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of transportation assistance projects itemized in section 5 with respect to which an interest is to be acquired in or constructed by the Department of Transportation, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $2,597,000,000.(d) (Reserved).(e) Flood control.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of flood control projects itemized in section 7 and to be constructed by the Department of Environmental Protection, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $9,900,000.(f) Fish Fund and Boat Fund.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of public improvement projects itemized in section 8 to be acquired or developed by the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission and to be financed by the incurring of debt or by current revenues of the Fish Fund and the Boat Fund pursuant to executive authorization shall be $208,900,000.(g) Manufacturing Fund.--The total authorization for the 20260SB1174PN1455 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 capital projects in the category of public improvement projects itemized in section 9 to be acquired or developed by the Department of Corrections and to be financed by current revenues of the Manufacturing Fund pursuant to executive authorization shall be $10,075,000.(h) Critical infrastructure investment.--The total authorization for the capital projects in the category of critical infrastructure investment projects itemized in section 10 for capital grants by the Office of the Budget, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt shall be $1,000,000,000.Section 3. Itemization of public improvement capital projects.Additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects to be acquired or constructed by the Department of General Services, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt, are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Department of Agriculture(i) Pennsylvania State University College of Agricultural Sciences, Centre County(A) Plant Science Facility to allow for cross-disciplinary innovation and research, including research facility, greenhouse, headhouse and climate-controlled plant production featuresProject Allocation 50,000,000(B) Animal Diagnostic Laboratory 20260SB1174PN1455 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 25,000,000(ii) Livestock Evaluation Center, Centre County(A) Construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(iii) New Bolton Center, Chester County(A) Construction of Pennsylvania Equine Toxicology and Research Laboratory on New Bolton Campus of The University of PennsylvaniaProject Allocation 25,000,000(iv) Annex, Dauphin County(A) New construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 15,000,000(v) Farm Show Complex, Dauphin County(A) Construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 50,000,000(vi) Headquarters, Veterinary Laboratory and Farm Show Complex, Dauphin County20260SB1174PN1455 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Upgrade security system and camerasProject Allocation 20,000,000(vii) Entomology Laboratory, Dauphin County(A) New construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 10,000,000(viii) Greenhouse and Nematology Laboratory, Dauphin County(A) New construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 15,000,000(ix) Animal Health Diagnostic Laboratory(A) Renovations, additions and construction, including site and infrastructure improvements for design and construction to satisfy modern testing proceduresProject Allocation 75,500,000(x) Headquarters, Department of Agriculture, Dauphin County(A) Renovations, additions and construction, including site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(2) Department of Conservation and Natural Resources20260SB1174PN1455 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Point State Park, Allegheny County(A) Portal bridge replacement and park sidewalk rehabilitation and ADA improvementsProject Allocation 6,000,000(B) Construct new parking facilities, park office, rehabilitate flag bastion area and install solar arraysProject Allocation 25,000,000(ii) Raccoon Creek State Park, Beaver County(A) Park improvementsProject Allocation 12,500,000(iii) Blue Knob State Park, Bedford County(A) Rehabilitation of Blue Knob Ski area, including improved facilities, parking, roadway and viewscapes to promote year-round recreationProject Allocation 25,000,000(iv) French Creek State Park, Berks County(A) Park improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(v) Delaware Canal State Park, Bucks County(A) Visitor center, park office and site rehabilitationProject Allocation 37,500,000(B) Replacement of 12 adjacent box beam bridges along Delaware CanalProject Allocation 6,000,000(vi) Moraine State Park, Butler County(A) Park improvements20260SB1174PN1455 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 45,000,000(vii) Gallitzin State Forest, Cambria County(A) Construct new district officeProject Allocation 23,000,000(viii) Prince Gallitzin State Park, Cambria County(A) Park improvementsProject Allocation 12,500,000(ix) Lehigh Gorge State Park, Carbon County(A) Design and build the trail system at Glen OnokoProject Allocation 7,000,000(x) Elk State Forest, Cameron County(A) Replace Brooks Run forest maintenance headquarters and storage buildingProject Allocation 4,000,000(B) Hicks Run Forest maintenance headquarters and five-bay pole buildingProject Allocation 1,250,000(xi) Hickory Run State Park, Carbon County(A) Park improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(xii) Black Moshannon State Park, Centre County(A) Park improvementsProject Allocation 12,500,000(xiii) Forest Fire Protection, Centre County(A) Construct new regional air operations facility20260SB1174PN1455 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 10,000,000(xiv) Mira Lloyd Dock Conservation Center, Centre County(A) Repairs to Penn Nursery Dam or Breach Dam and construct alternative water supply for irrigation systemProject Allocation 5,000,000(xv) Penn Nursery, Centre County(A) Construct new seed extraction buildingProject Allocation 6,300,000(xvi) Sproul State Forest, Centre County(A) Replace Snowshoe maintenance headquartersProject Allocation 4,500,000(xvii) Big Elk Creek State Park, Chester County(A) State park development phase 2 and land acquisitionProject Allocation 19,000,000(xviii) Parker Dam State Park, Clearfield County(A) Dam repairs and lake dredgingProject Allocation 37,500,000(xix) Moshannon State Forest, Clearfield County(A) Demolish Dague Mechanics Shop and replace with modern mechanics shopProject Allocation 2,500,000(B) Repairs to Shaggers Inn Dam20260SB1174PN1455 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 11,000,000(xx) Bald Eagle State Forest, Clinton County(A) Construct new wood shop, groomer storage and pole storage buildingProject Allocation 5,625,000(xxi) Pymatuning State Park, Crawford County(A) Park improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Rehabilitate State Park campground facilitiesProject Allocation 2,000,000(xxii) Forestry Lab, Dauphin County(A) Construction of new laboratory, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 40,000,000(xxiii) Geologic Survey Headquarters, Dauphin County(A) Construct a new headquarters building for the Bureau of Geologic SurveyProject Allocation 30,000,000(xxiv) Ridley Creek State Park, Delaware County(A) Park improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(xxv) Presque Isle State Park, Erie County(A) Sand nourishmentProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Dune replacement and resource workProject Allocation 12,500,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Roads and multipurpose trail rehabilitationProject Allocation 8,750,000(D) Park improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(xxvi) Laurel Caverns, Fayette County(A) Development of day-use, visitor center and overnight facilitiesProject Allocation 30,000,000(xxvii) Cornplanter State Park, Forest County(A) Construct new resource management center and storage buildingProject Allocation 17,000,000(xxviii) Michaux State Forest, Franklin County(A) Construct resource management center and storage buildingProject Allocation 30,000,000(xxix) Buchanan State Forest, Fulton County(A) Replace Sideling Hill maintenance headquarters and mechanics shopProject Allocation 3,600,000(xxx) Cowans Gap State Park, Fulton County(A) Rehabilitate Cowans Gap DamProject Allocation 9,000,000(B) Construct park office and visitor centerProject Allocation 6,000,000(xxxi) Ryerson Station State Park, Greene County20260SB1174PN1455 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Resource and recreation improvements Phase 2Project Allocation 12,500,000(B) Improvements to Ryerson Station State Park - dam removalProject Allocation 4,000,000(xxxii) Yellow Creek State Park, Indiana County(A) Day use rehabilitationProject Allocation 7,500,000(xxxiii) Clear Creek State Forest, Jefferson County(A) New maintenance shop and equipment storageProject Allocation 3,500,000(xxxiv) Pinchot State Forest, Lackawanna County(A) Breach and remove Edgerton DamProject Allocation 3,000,000(B) Breach and remove Olyphant Dam No. 3 Project Allocation 3,000,000(xxxv) Memorial Lake State Park, Lebanon County(A) Rehabilitate damProject Allocation 17,000,000(xxxvi) Forest Fire Protection, Luzerne County(A) Rebuild Hazelton Air Operations building, including site improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxxvii) Pinchot State Forest, Luzerne County(A) Construct Pinchot forest district resource management center complexProject Allocation 25,000,000(xxxviii) Tiadaghton State Forest, Lycoming County(A) Construct new Waterville mechanics garage and storageProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxix) Maurice K. Goddard State Park, Mercer County(A) Redevelopment of park facilitiesProject Allocation 8,500,000(xl) Tuscarora State Forest, Mifflin County(A) Replace East Licking Creek forest maintenance headquartersProject Allocation 5,750,000(xli) Norristown Farm Park, Montgomery County(A) Replace multiple vehicular and pedestrian bridgesProject Allocation 12,000,000(B) Transportation infrastructure and bridgesProject Allocation 25,000,000(xlii) Shikellamy State Park, Northumberland County(A) Full replacement of dam and permanent causewayProject Allocation 60,000,000(xliii) Delaware State Forest, Pike County20260SB1174PN1455 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Lilly Pond Dam spillway repair and replacementProject Allocation 11,000,000(xliv) Denton Hill State Park, Potter County(A) Upgrade, rehabilitation or replacement of ski lift, lighting, equipment, parking and structures to improve operations, recreation and public safetyProject Allocation 37,500,000(xlv) Gallitzin State Forest, Somerset County(A) Raze and replace the Babcock Forest maintenance headquarters and storage buildingProject Allocation 5,625,000(xlvi) Kooser State Park, Somerset County(A) Day use and dam rehabilitationProject Allocation 12,000,000(xlvii) Laurel Hill State Park, Somerset County(A) Park improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(xlviii) Loyalsock State Forest, Sullivan County(A) Resource management rehabilitation or replacementProject Allocation 2,000,000(xlix) Leonard Harrison State Park, Tioga County(A) Turkey Path Trail rehabilitation and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 realignmentProject Allocation 4,500,000(l) Tioga State Forest, Tioga County(A) Construct new maintenance headquartersProject Allocation 3,750,000(B) Construct new resource management centerProject Allocation 40,000,000(li) Vosburg Neck State Park, Wyoming County(A) State park development and land acquisition Phase 2Project Allocation 19,000,000(lii) Susquehanna Riverlands State Park, York County(A) State park development and land acquisition Phase 2Project Allocation 32,000,000(liii) Forestry - Statewide(A) Dam rehabilitation or removal at various impoundmentsProject Allocation 60,000,000(liv) State Parks - Statewide(A) Upgrades and improvements to campground washhouses, utilities, site work and other amenities, including new construction, renovations and alterationsProject Allocation 37,500,000(B) Provide additional funding for the 20260SB1174PN1455 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dredging and removal of various lakesProject Allocation 25,000,000(C) Upgrades and improvements of campground washhouses, utilities, site work and other amenitiesProject Allocation 37,500,000(D) Rehabilitate historic structuresProject Allocation 14,000,000(E) Critical regulatory system repairs and replacements at multiple water and wastewater treatment plantsProject Allocation 37,500,000(F) New construction, renovations and alterations at roofed overnight colonies, including improvements to supporting infrastructure at multiple locationsProject Allocation 7,000,000(G) Improvements to training academy infrastructure and rangeProject Allocation 50,000,000(H) Dam rehabilitation, lake dredging and various dam impoundmentsProject Allocation 95,000,000(I) Replacement and rehabilitation of multiple maintenance facilitiesProject Allocation 12,500,000(3) Department of Corrections(i) State Correctional Institution at Benner, Centre County20260SB1174PN1455 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 42,413,000(ii) State Correctional Institution at Rockview, Centre County(A) Design and construction of building decommissioning, utility separation and site work in preparation of demolitionProject Allocation 10,000,000(iii) State Correctional Institution at Houtzdale, Clearfield County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 35,590,000(iv) State Correctional Institution at Cambridge Springs, Crawford County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 31,504,000(v) State Correctional Institution at Camp Hill, Cumberland County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 378,460,000(vi) State Correctional Institution at Chester, Delaware County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 29,575,000(vii) State Correctional Institution at Albion, Erie County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 35,877,000(viii) State Correctional Institution at 20260SB1174PN1455 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Fayette, Fayette County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 16,177,000(ix) State Correctional Institution at Forest, Forest County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 75,113,000(x) State Correctional Institution at Greene, Greene County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 36,180,000(xi) State Correctional Institution at Huntingdon, Huntingdon County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 34,932,000(xii) State Correctional Institution at Smithfield, Huntingdon County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 27,976,000(xiii) State Correctional Institution at Pine Grove, Indiana County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 75,761,000(xiv) Elizabethtown Training Facility, Lancaster County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 778,977,000(xv) State Correctional Institution at Dallas, Luzerne County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 37,750,000(xvi) State Correctional Institution at Muncy, Lycoming County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 127,144,000(xvii) State Correctional Institution at Mercer, Mercer County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 34,837,000(xviii) State Correctional Institution at 20260SB1174PN1455 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Graterford, Montgomery County(A) Demolition of facility, including code, permit, site, utility and infrastructure-related issuesProject Allocation 99,723,000(xix) State Correctional Institution at Phoenix, Montgomery County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 24,826,000(xx) State Correctional Institution at Coal Township, Northumberland County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 46,239,000(xxi) State Correctional Institution at Frackville, Schuylkill County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 72,244,000(xxii) State Correctional Institution at Mahanoy, Schuylkill County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 68,786,000(xxiii) State Correctional Institution at Laurel Highlands, Somerset County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 42,471,000(xxiv) State Correctional Institution at Somerset, Somerset County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 48,949,000(xxv) State Correctional Institution at 20260SB1174PN1455 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Waymart, Wayne County(A) Design and construction of building expansion, new construction, renovations and alterations, including upgrade of utilities and related infrastructure, land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 63,028,000(4) Department of Education(i) Department of Education Headquarters (Reserved)(ii) University of Pittsburgh(A) Building to connect the multiple mid-campus buildings - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 300,000,000(B) Campuswide programmatic and infrastructure upgrades to buildings - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. This project will provide modern facilities for teaching, research, office and support that meet today's building codes, energy-efficient systems and accommodations for special needs students, faculty and staffProject Allocation 100,000,000(C) Existing apartment building or hotel 20260SB1174PN1455 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for student housing - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Purchase and renovation of existing apartment building or hotel in the Oakland area for student housingProject Allocation 180,000,000(D) Former PAA building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation of the former PAA BuildingProject Allocation 180,000,000(E) New laboratory and classroom building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 480,000,000(F) Old Engineering Hall - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 480,000,000(G) Parking garages - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 60,000,000(H) New residence hall - Oakland Campus, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 132,000,000(I) Space Research Coordination Center (SRCC) building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 480,000,000(J) Fitzgerald Fieldhouse - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 240,000,000(K) New indoor track and band facility - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, including land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 180,000,000(L) New multisport athletic and entertainment facility - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, including land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvements, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 extension of utilitiesProject Allocation 780,000,000(M) One Bigelow Academic Teaching and Research Complex - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, including land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 480,000,000(N) New School of Dental Medicine building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, including land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 240,000,000(O) New School of Nursing building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, including land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 240,000,000(P) New Student Union building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. New construction, including land development, site acquisition and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 240,000,000(Q) Trees Hall - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction, alterations, land 20260SB1174PN1455 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development, site infrastructure improvements, including improvements to meet current building codes and ADA, mechanical, electrical and fire protection systems upgradesProject Allocation 200,000,000(R) Twentieth Century Club building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction, alterations, land development, site infrastructure improvement, including improvements to meet current building codes and ADA, mechanical, electrical and fire protection systems upgradesProject Allocation 100,000,000(S) Western Psychiatric Hospital and Clinic (WPIC) parking garage - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovation, new construction, alterations, land development and site infrastructure improvement, including improvements to meet current building codes and ADAProject Allocation 100,000,000(T) William Pitt Union Building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Renovate the 175,000-square-foot, historic 1897 William Pitt Student Union, with the lower levels to continue its assembly use and the upper floors to undergo a renovation and repurpose as a Student 20260SB1174PN1455 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Residence Hall. This project includes infrastructure, utilities, ADA and egress upgrades needed to support the residence hallProject Allocation 180,000,000(U) Trees Hall Basketball Practice Facility - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. This project will renovate the east wing of existing 1961 Trees Hall for the men's and women's practice basketball space, inclusive of a Hall of Fame entry, courts, locker rooms, training areas and coaches' officesProject Allocation 36,000,000(V) Gardner Steel, O'Hara Student Center and new connecting building - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. This project will renovate and repurpose the existing 1912 Gardner Steel Conference Center and 1913 O'Hara Student Center and construct a connecting building in the complex for Student Commons, Teaching Laboratories, classrooms, conference space and officesProject Allocation 180,000,000(W) Public Realm Improvements - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. The 2025 University Campus Master Plan proposes improvements to existing plazas (Barco, Litchfield, Posvar, etc). This 20260SB1174PN1455 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 project will span the campus and upgrade accessibility and wayfinding across the Oakland Campus, constructing new elevators, ramps, stairs and outdoor campus amenities.Project Allocation 90,000,000(X) Litchfield Towers - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. This project will renovate Litchfield Towers and construct an addition to improve the ground level experience and legibility of the buildingProject Allocation 60,000,000(Y) Parking garage - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. Pitt's Oakland Campus has a current shortfall of more than 250 parking spaces. This project will construct a parking structure with multimodal hub components, including EV chargers and bicycle storage for campus commuters and visitorsProject Allocation 60,000,000(Z) AI Research and Teaching Complex - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. This project will advance the university's initiatives in Artificial Intelligence, life sciences and biomedical engineering by constructing a new research and office building, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including collaborating space for interdisciplinary advancement of approximately 200,000 square feet on Oakland campusProject Allocation 300,000,000(AA) School of Medicine and Health Sciences Modernization and Consolidation - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. The university School of Medicine will consolidate research offices and laboratories in off-campus leased space into university-owned buildings on the Oakland campus. This project will renovate existing space to receive the returning departments, including improving and upgrading the support infrastructure needed for fully functioning systems and improved, efficient laboratory and office spaceProject Allocation 500,000,000(BB) Bellefield Hall - Oakland Campus, Allegheny County. This project will renovate the existing 112,000 square foot circa 1925 Bellefield Hall for student academic and support spaces, studio and practice rooms, academic offices and assembly spaces, along with the infrastructure improvements needed to support the programs20260SB1174PN1455 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 60,000,000(CC) Programmatic and Infrastructure Upgrades - Bradford Campus, McKean County. This project will provide modern facilities for teaching, research, office and support which meet today's building codes, energy-efficient systems and accommodations for special needs students, facility and staffProject Allocation 24,000,000(DD) Programmatic and Infrastructure Upgrades - Greensburg Campus, Westmoreland County. This project will provide modern facilities for teaching, research, office and support which meet today's building codes, energy-efficient systems and accommodations for special needs students, facility and staffProject Allocation 24,000,000(EE) Programmatic and Infrastructure Upgrades - Johnstown Campus, Cambria County. This project will provide modern facilities for teaching, research, office and support which meet today's building codes, energy-efficient systems and accommodations for special needs students, facility and staff20260SB1174PN1455 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 24,000,000(FF) Programmatic and Infrastructure Upgrades - Titusville Campus, Cambria County. This project will provide modern facilities for teaching, research, office and support which meet today's building codes, energy- efficient systems and accommodations for special needs students, facility and staffProject Allocation 24,000,000(iii) The Pennsylvania State University(A) Atherton Street Steam Line Crossing - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Atherton Street Steam Line Crossing at Penn State University Park. This project involves the installation of a new steam line that traverses Atherton Street and will connect West Campus with the central steam system. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Chiller unit - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a chiller unit at Penn State University Park. This chiller unit will replace an existing, smaller chiller unit which will delay the need of a new chilled water plant. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation 20260SB1174PN1455 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 25,000,000(C) Demolition program - University Park, Centre County. Additional funding for the design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Demolition Program at Penn State University Park. This project involves the demolition of campus facilities. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-20260SB1174PN1455 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 20,000,000(D) Eisenhower Auditorium Renovation - University Park, Centre County. Additional funding for the design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Eisenhower Auditorium at Penn State University Park. This project will renovate the building in order to provide a modernized facility that adequately supports the instructional and public performance functions of this campus. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-20260SB1174PN1455 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 45,000,000(E) Electrical interconnection work - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for electrical interconnection work at Penn State University Park. This project will provide a new high-voltage, electrical interconnection between electrical substations to provide a single electrical distribution network. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as 20260SB1174PN1455 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 30,000,000(F) Former Palmer Museum of Art - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Former Palmer Museum of Art at Penn State University Park. The general project scope is to renew the originally constructed 1971 and 1990 buildings to meet the new program which includes both general purpose classrooms and College of Arts and Architecture support spaces. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-20260SB1174PN1455 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 50,000,000(G) FRONTIER (Forging a Renaissance of Nuclear Through Innovation, Entrepreneurship, and Research) University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for FRONTIER at Penn State University Park. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 50,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (H) General academic building - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the renovation of a general academic building at Penn State University Park. This project will include administrative areas, support spaces, instructional spaces, seminar rooms and offices. The facility will be equipped with state-of-the-art technology. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 150,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) General research building - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the renovation of a general research building at Penn State University Park. This project will include new research laboratories, support spaces, instructional spaces, seminar rooms, offices and administration space. The facility will be equipped with state-of-the-art technology. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 150,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (J) Greenhouses and headhouse complexes relocation (PlantWorks) - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the relocation of the greenhouses and headhouse complexes, also known as PlantWorks, at Penn State University Park. The existing, on-campus greenhouses in the Curtin Road complex will be demolished and relocated to an all-new research greenhouse complex on campus. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes20260SB1174PN1455 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 200,000,000(K) Hot water distribution system - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a hot water distribution system at Penn State University Park. This project will serve as the initial phase of a transition from steam-based heating to hot-water-based heating. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codes.Project Allocation 70,000,000(L) Millennium Science Complex II - 20260SB1174PN1455 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for Millennium Science Complex II at Penn State University Park. This state-of-the-art facility will serve as the 'hub' for the Institutes for Biomedical and Health Sciences and will push the university to the forefront of biomedical research. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 340,000,000(M) Reclaimed Water System - University 20260SB1174PN1455 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for a reclaimed water system at Penn State University Park. Use of a reclaimed water system will greatly reduce the demands of the university on local groundwater systems. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 10,500,000(N) Sackett Building Renovation - University Park, Centre County. Additional funding for the design, construction (new space or addition to 20260SB1174PN1455 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Sackett Building at Penn State University Park. Sackett Building requires buildingwide renewal to include building and life safety system and accessibility upgrades. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 20,000,000(O) South chiller plant - heat recovery chillers - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous 20260SB1174PN1455 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for heat recovery chillers at the south chiller plant at Penn State University Park. These heat recovery chillers would add chilled water capacity and provide efficiency, energy, resiliency and operational improvements to the overall system. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 25,000,000(P) Sustainable Energy and Environmental Innovation Complex - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or 20260SB1174PN1455 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Sustainable Energy and Environmental Innovation Complex at Penn State University Park. This new facility will serve as an integrated magnet for the university and a model for the Commonwealth and the nation, providing the roadmap through energy transition and climate change impact mitigation. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 200,000,000(Q) Systems Renewal Program - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of 20260SB1174PN1455 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Systems Renewal Program at Penn State University Park. This project will allow the university to replace, install or upgrade as appropriate systems in major academic, research and administrative buildings across Penn State University Park. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 120,000,000(R) XLP Cable Replacement Program - University Park, Centre County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the XLP Cable Replacement Program at Penn State University Park. Replacement of the faulty, 1980s-era XLP cable is a significant safety initiative of the university. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 16,500,000(S) Systems Renewal Program - Milton S. Hershey Medical Center, Dauphin County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the 20260SB1174PN1455 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Systems Renewal Program at the Milton S. Hershey Medical Center. This project is part of a continuing effort to make significant, comprehensive upgrades to infrastructure in the College of Medicine facilities at the Milton S. Hershey Medical Center. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 50,000,000(T) Stone Valley Forestry Building - University Park, Huntingdon County. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the 20260SB1174PN1455 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Stone Valley Forestry Building at Penn State University Park. This opportunity to erect a new, modern and efficient Stone Valley Forestry Building will certainly enhance the Forestland Management Office's ability to meet its mission, vision and strategic objectives. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 10,000,000(U) Systems Renewal Program - Statewide Campuses. Design, construction (new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing space, including demolition, abatement of hazardous materials, extensions and/or upgrading of utilities and other infrastructure needs) and other related costs for the Systems Renewal Program at the 20260SB1174PN1455 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth Campuses. This project will allow the university to replace, install or upgrade as appropriate systems in major academic, research and administrative buildings across the Commonwealth campuses. Funding will be used for both design and construction costs, as well as necessary utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades. All costs for both occupant and program relocation or interim facilities will be included. The construction will both meet all current building code requirements and provide for barrier-free access as required by the Americans with Disabilities Act and related codesProject Allocation 60,000,000(iv) Temple University(A) Alternative energy infrastructure - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and installation of alternative energy systems, including utility upgrades and extensions, and site improvements at Temple's domestic campusesProject Allocation 80,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Ambulatory Care Center - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, demolition of existing buildings and construction of a new ambulatory care center building, including utility upgrades and site improvements, at the Health Sciences Center Campus of Temple UniversityProject Allocation 400,000,000(C) Energy services facility - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction or renovation of a microgrid facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements, code-related upgrades and ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 125,000,000(D) Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics (STEM) Academic Building - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, demolition of existing building and construction of a new STEM academic complex, including utility upgrades and site improvements at the Main Campus. This will involve renovations and addition to an existing building and constructing a stand-alone building. This project 20260SB1174PN1455 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 will also include site improvements to create a new campus quad.Project Allocation 400,000,000(E) Facilities and infrastructure renewal - various campuses, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, site improvements and other related costs for renovations and retrofits to improve energy efficiency, sustainability and functionality of buildings and infrastructure at domestic campusesProject Allocation 200,000,000(F) Interdisciplinary research facility - Main Campus, Health Sciences Center Campus or Ambler Campus, Philadelphia County. Acquisition, design, infrastructure improvements, abatement of hazardous materials and renovation or construction of a research building, including utility upgrades and site improvements at the Main Campus, Health Sciences Center Campus or Ambler CampusProject Allocation 300,000,000(G) Klein Hall - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction of an 20260SB1174PN1455 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 academic/administrative building, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements and code-related upgrades, including ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 185,000,000(H) Microgrid facility - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials and construction or renovation of a microgrid facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, and site improvementsProject Allocation 50,000,000(I) Multiuse facility - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, renovations and addition to existing historical building for an adaptive reuse as a multiuse facility, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements, code-related upgrades and ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 50,000,000(J) Storm water management systems - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, demolition and installation of storm water management systems, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including utility upgrades and extensions, and site improvementsProject Allocation 50,000,000(K) Revitalization of former University of the Arts facilities - Main Campus, Philadelphia County. Acquisition, design, infrastructure improvements, abatement of hazardous materials, demolition, renovations and additions to multiple facilities, including utility upgrades and extensions, site improvements, code-related upgrades and ADA compliance-related upgradesProject Allocation 300,000,000(v) Lincoln University(A) 3020 Market Street, University City District, Philadelphia County. Renovation and alterations to third and fourth floor, addition of exterior signage and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Alumni House - renovations, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development, and site infrastructure improvements.Project Allocation 20,000,000(C) Athletics Dome, Chester County. New 20260SB1174PN1455 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction and site development of Athletic DomeProject Allocation 3,500,000(D) Campuswide fire alarm panel upgrades and HVAC improvements, Chester County. Fire panel replacement, upgrades, HVAC replacement and improvements of failing and outdated components throughout campusProject Allocation 4,635,000(E) Campuswide infrastructure improvements, Chester County. Infrastructure replacement, facility renovations, upgrades and improvements of failing components throughout campusProject Allocation 82,500,000(F) Campuswide roof replacements, Chester County. Facility renovations and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 7,500,000(G) Campuswide security improvements, Chester County. Active shooter hardware upgrades for building doors throughout campusProject Allocation 751,000(H) Campuswide Storm Water Mitigation and Management System, Chester County. Storm water management mitigation and management upgrades to decaying 20260SB1174PN1455 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure, including design, infrastructure, abatement of hazardous materials, demolition and installation of storm water management systems, including utility upgrades, extensions and site improvements at main campus.Project Allocation 50,000,000(I) Center for Black Culture, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(J) Faculty and staff housing upgrades, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(K) Grim Hall - Renovations, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(L) Heritage Center, Chester County. Renovation, new construction, alterations and site infrastructure improvements for additionProject Allocation 8,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (M) Historic District, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 12,500,000(N) Hosanna Church, Chester County. Facility renovations and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 6,000,000(O) Houston Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(P) Lincoln Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 20,000,000(Q) Lucy Laney Hall, Library and Amos House, Chester County. Renovation, new construction, alterations and site infrastructure upgrades and improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(R) Manuel Rivero (Hall) Gymnasium, Chester County. Renovation, new 20260SB1174PN1455 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 53,648,000(S) Mary Dod Brown Chapel, Chester County. Facility renovations and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(T) McCauley Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 31,251,000(U) McRary Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 33,000,000(V) Microgrid, solar panels and geothermal infrastructure, Chester County. Campuswide facility renovations and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 75,000,000(W) Nelson Science Center, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure 20260SB1174PN1455 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(X) Perimeter road, Chester County. Perimeter road reconfiguration and new guard boothProject Allocation 6,000,000(Y) Physical plant, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 15,000,000(Z) Quad housing, Chester County. Facility renovations, infrastructure upgrades, new building for student services, administrative offices and liberal arts classrooms. May include demolition of one or more existing residence hallsProject Allocation 50,000,000(AA) Rendall Hall, Chester County. Facility renovations and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(BB) New residence hall - Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 62,500,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (CC) Social Sciences Building, Chester County. New construction, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 40,000,000(DD) Solar panels and electric vehicle charging stations, Chester County and Philadelphia County. Design and construct solar panels and electric vehicle charging stations at main campus and Philly campus, including site and utility workProject Allocation 12,500,000(EE) Thurgood Marshall Living Learning Center, Chester County. HVAC replacement, upgrades and improvements of failing componentsProject Allocation 12,678,000(FF) University Hall, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 12,500,000(GG) Ware Center for the Performing Arts, Chester County. Renovation, new construction and alterations, including land development and site infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology(A) Greiner Buildings, Lancaster County. Renovations, repairs, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, exterior painting, HVAC improvements and mechanical upgradesProject Allocation 18,500,000(B) Griscom Learning Center and Orange Street Campus, Lancaster County. Renovations, repairs, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, HVAC improvements and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 15,400,000(C) Hartzell Building, Lancaster County. Renovation, replacement and upgrade of all systems, roof, HVAC, infrastructure and interiors to standards and code, including alterations, new construction, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 18,050,000(D) Historic Almshouse Building, Lancaster County. Renovations, repairs, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, ADA upgrades, all mechanical upgrades and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 26,150,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) Jones Building, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, site improvements, HVAC improvements and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 22,000,000(F) Mellor Building, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, site improvements, exterior painting and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 50,000,000(G) Multipurpose activity center building, Lancaster County. Renovations and upgrades of campus athletic center.Project Allocation 6,500,000(H) Mervine Library and Schuler Learning Resources Center, Lancaster County. Renovations, repairs, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, exterior painting, HVAC improvements and mechanical upgradesProject Allocation 30,000,000(I) Schwalm Building Student Center, Lancaster County. Renovate existing facility to provide expanded and improved student center adjacent to planned new dormitory and dining facility20260SB1174PN1455 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 11,350,000(J) Student Center addition, Lancaster County. Renovations, upgrades, HVAC and mechanical upgradesProject Allocation 5,500,000(K) Snyder/Woolworth Buildings, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, additions, infrastructure upgrades, site improvements and associated design and constructionProject Allocation 23,000,000(L) Warehouse, Lancaster County. Renovations and upgrades to main central warehouse, including roof, mechanical and exterior upgradesProject Allocation 5,100,000(M) Dormitories, campuswide, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, repairs, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction, including HVAC improvementsProject Allocation 15,000,000(N) Improvements, campuswide, Lancaster County. Improvements to meet current and future demands, including land acquisition, site and building infrastructure improvements, new construction, renovations, additions, exterior painting, HVAC and mechanical and building system upgrades and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 improvements, including associated design and constructionProject Allocation 50,000,000(O) Safety and security upgrades, campuswide, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction to update and provide for missing and outdated safety and security equipment, including replacement and upgrade of door entrances, swipe card systems and camera monitoring systemsProject Allocation 13,000,000(P) Safety and security upgrades, campuswide, Lancaster County. Renovations, alterations, infrastructure upgrades and associated design and construction to update and provide for missing and outdated safety and security equipment, including replacement of missing and outdated lighting and equipmentProject Allocation 6,500,000(Q) Sidewalks and roads, campuswide, Lancaster County. Sidewalk and road repairsProject Allocation 6,500,000(5) Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency(i) Headquarters building, Dauphin County20260SB1174PN1455 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Infrastructure improvements, including replacement of electrical switch gearProject Allocation 6,000,000(ii) Special Operations Center, Dauphin County(A) Construction of a state-of-the-art training facility, including land acquisition, site development and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 75,000,000(iii) Western Area Office, Indiana County(A) Construction of a state-of-the-art emergency operations and coordination center in the western area of this Commonwealth, including land acquisition, site development and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 6,000,000(iv) State Fire Academy, Mifflin County(A) Construction of a state-of-the-art training facility, including land acquisition, site development and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(6) Department of Environmental Protection(i) Pitcairn Borough Flood Control Project, Allegheny County(A) New flood protection project along Dirty Camp Run20260SB1174PN1455 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 6,000,000(ii) Streets Run Flood Control Project, Allegheny County(A) New flood protection project along Streets RunProject Allocation 24,000,000(iii) New Kernsville, Berks County(A) Demolition of warehouse structure and scrap removalProject Allocation 1,500,000(iv) Northern Cambria Borough flood control, Cambria County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 2,400,000(v) Wilmore Borough Flood Protection Project, Cambria County(A) New levee project along Little Conemaugh River and North Branch of Little Conemaugh RiverProject Allocation 4,800,000(vi) Solomon Run Flood Protection Project, Cambria County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Saint Clair Run Flood Protection Project, Cambria County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 2,000,000(viii) Sam's Run Flood Protection Project, Cambria County20260SB1174PN1455 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 10,000,000(ix) Pine Glen/Avery Cola Company, Centre County(A) Upgrade and rebuild aging lime plant used to treat acid mine drainage, including land acquisitionProject Allocation 3,700,000(x) Alder Run/Thompson Brother Coal Company, Centre County(A) Upgrade and rebuild aging lime plant used to treat acid mine drainage, including land acquisitionProject Allocation 2,700,000(xi) Fye/Larry D. Baumgardner Coal Company, Centre County(A) Upgrade and rebuild aging lime plant used to treat acid mine drainage, including land acquisitionProject Allocation 1,350,000(xii) Timothy A. Keck/Keck 1, Clarion County(A) Reclamation of dangerous highwalls and revegetation of the siteProject Allocation 1,100,000(xiii) Buck Run/Al Hamilton Treatment Trust, Clearfield County(A) Upgrade and rehabilitate failing passive treatment systemProject Allocation 600,000(xiv) Reed/Sky Haven Treatment Trust, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Clearfield County(A) Upgrade and rehabilitate failing passive treatment systemProject Allocation 425,000(xv) Manor Mine/Al Hamilton Treatment Trust, Clearfield County(A) Upgrade and rebuild aging lime plant used to treat acid mine drainage, including land acquisitionProject Allocation 5,175,000(xvi) Stinky Run Flood Control Project, Clearfield County(A) Culvert projectProject Allocation 14,400,000(xvii) Big Run/Avery Coal, Clinton County(A) Rehabilitate failing passive treatment systemProject Allocation 2,000,000(xviii) New laboratory, Dauphin County(A) Construction of new laboratory, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 80,000,000(xix) Rachel Carson State Office Building, Dauphin County(A) Statewide projects for space consolidation effortsProject Allocation 11,000,000(xx) Isabella Mine Site, Fayette County(A) Comprehensive reclamation project to 20260SB1174PN1455 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 address land reclamation, primary discharge structure and conveyance channel for freshwater impoundment and AMD discharge collection and treatment systemProject Allocation 25,000,000(xxi) Brockway Clay Company, Jefferson County(A) Reclamation of two abandoned noncoal mining permitsProject Allocation 1,480,000(xxii) Weisner Hollow Slurry Dam Reclamation, Jefferson County(A) Regrade a stream channel and close off a coal refuse channel, including the overflow channelsProject Allocation 27,200,000(xxiii) Hull Creek, Lackawanna County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxiv) Roaring Brook Flood Protection Project, Lackawanna County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 13,200,000(xxv) Ashley - Sulfur Run, Luzerne County(A) Flood protection projectProject Allocation 7,200,000(xxvi) Brown Creek Flood Protection Project, Luzerne County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 10,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxvii) 21st Centuramics, McKean County(A) Reclamation of dangerous highwalls and revegetation of the siteProject Allocation 2,860,000(xxviii) Port Allegany Borough Flood Control, McKean County(A) Levee projectProject Allocation 30,000,000(xxix) Glenside Area Flood Protection Project, Montgomery County(A) Flood protection projectProject Allocation 7,200,000(xxx) Flat Rock Dam, Montgomery and Philadelphia Counties(A) Rehabilitate/repair dam and appurtenances and sediment removalProject Allocation 100,000,000(xxxi) Flat Rock Dam facilities, Philadelphia County(A) Rehabilitation of canal wall and erosion protectionProject Allocation 50,000,000(xxxii) Auburn Dam, Schuylkill County(A) Rehabilitate/repair dam and appurtenances and sediment removalProject Allocation 80,000,000(xxxiii) Auburn Dam, Schuylkill County(A) Rehabilitation of warehouse and scrap removalProject Allocation 1,500,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxxiv) Tamaqua Dam facilities, Schuylkill County(A) Demolition of warehouse and scrap removalProject Allocation 1,500,000(xxxv) Elkland Borough Flood Protection Project, Tioga County(A) Flood protection projectProject Allocation 24,000,000(xxxvi) Harvey's Lake - Wordon Place Flood Protection Project, Tioga County(A) Rehabilitation of flood protectionProject Allocation 2,200,000(xxxvii) S&K Energy, Inc., Lounder Mine, Washington County(A) Reclamation of highwalls and revegetate the siteProject Allocation 3,220,000(xxxviii) S&K Energy, Inc., Bare II Surface Mine, Washington County(A) Reclamation of highwalls, backfilling pits and revegetate the siteProject Allocation 2,750,000(xxxix) Banning #4 and Euclid Combination Treatment Facility, Westmoreland County(A) Combination treatment facility will be constructed to eliminate the two independent facilities that maintain the underground mine poolProject Allocation 22,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xl) Northmont Area - Greensburg City Flood Control, Westmoreland County(A) Culvert channel and culvert improvement projectProject Allocation 9,600,000(xli) Jeannette - Brush Creek, Westmoreland County(A) Rehabilitation and extension of levee and floodwall flood protection systemProject Allocation 6,000,000(xlii) Flood Protection Reconstruction Project, Statewide(A) Reconstruction of multiple existing levee street and railroad closure projectsProject Allocation 40,000,000(7) Department of General Services(i) Pedestrian bridges, Dauphin County(A) Construction of bridges across Forster Street and 7th Street, including site acquisition and land development, design and construction and utility workProject Allocation 45,000,000(ii) State Street Bridge, Dauphin County(A) Renovations and improvement to State Street BridgeProject Allocation 50,000,000(iii) Warehouse and fleet garage, Cumberland and Dauphin Counties20260SB1174PN1455 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Construction of warehouse and garage facilities, including auxiliary support buildings, site acquisition and land development, design and construction and utility workProject Allocation 200,000,000(iv) Finance Building, Dauphin County(A) Renovations, alterations, construction, site improvements and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 80,000,000(v) Health and Human Services Building, Dauphin County(A) Renovations, alterations, construction, site improvements and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 180,000,000(vi) Labor and Industry Building, Dauphin County(A) Renovations, alterations, construction, site improvements and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 280,000,000(vii) Statewide(A) Renovations, alterations, construction, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisition for Department of General Services-owned buildings and structures20260SB1174PN1455 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 200,000,000(B) Design and construct solar panel and electric vehicle charging stations at Commonwealth facilities, including land acquisition and site and utility workProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) Professional services for the development of agency facility strategic master plans and capital planningProject Allocation 40,000,000(D) Demolition of existing structures and remediation of environmentally hazardous materials to various Commonwealth-owned buildingsProject Allocation 150,000,000(8) Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission(i) Fort Pitt, Allegheny County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 1,000,000(ii) Old Economy Village, Beaver County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Exhibit upgradesProject Allocation 2,000,000(iii) Conrad Weiser Homestead, Berks County20260SB1174PN1455 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 1,500,000(iv) Daniel Boone Homestead, Berks County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(v) Pennsbury Manor, Bucks County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(vi) Eckley Miners Village, Carbon County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Pennsylvania Military Museum, Centre County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(viii) State Museum of Pennsylvania, Dauphin County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 30,000,000(ix) State Archives, Dauphin County20260SB1174PN1455 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 4,000,000(x) Erie Maritime Museum, Erie County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xi) Anthracite Heritage Museum, Lackawanna County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xii) Landis Valley Village and Farm Museum, Lancaster County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xiii) Railroad Museum of Pennsylvania, Lancaster County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(B) Exhibit upgradesProject Allocation 2,000,000(C) Rolling stock restoration for roundhouse exhibitProject Allocation 10,000,000(xiv) Cornwall Iron Furnace, Lebanon County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvements20260SB1174PN1455 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(xv) Hope Lodge, Montgomery County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 3,000,000(xvi) Joseph Priestley House, Northumberland County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xvii) Pennsylvania Lumber Museum, Potter County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(xviii) Somerset Historical Center, Somerset County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 3,000,000(B) Exhibit upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(xix) Drake Well Museum, Venango County(A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xx) Bushy Run Battlefield, Westmoreland County20260SB1174PN1455 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Building, site and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 7,000,000(B) Exhibit improvementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(xxi) Statewide historic sites(A) Renovations, alterations and site upgrades for long-term maintenance, ADA, code and energy improvementsProject Allocation 15,000,000(9) Department of Human Services(i) Wernersville State Hospital, Berks County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(ii) Western Secure Treatment Unit, Butler County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 75,000,000(iii) Ebensburg Center, Cambria County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(iv) South Mountain Restoration Center, Franklin County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(v) South Mountain Secure Treatment Unit, Franklin County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(vi) Youth Forestry Camp No. 3, Huntingdon County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(vii) Clarks Summit State Hospital, Lackawanna County(A) Renovate the institution, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(viii) North East Secure Treatment Unit, Luzerne County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 50,000,000(ix) Norristown State Hospital, Montgomery County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(B) Additional funds for the design and construction of a psychiatric forensic building on existing lands of the Commonwealth at Norristown State Hospital in West Norriton Township to be utilized for the care and treatment of clients admitted to the institution Project Allocation 250,000,000(x) South East Youth Development Center, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Montgomery County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(xi) Danville State Hospital, Montour County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(xii) North Central Secure Treatment Unit, Montour County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(xiii) Loysville Youth Development Center, Perry County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xiv) Selinsgrove Center, Snyder County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(xv) Warren State Hospital, Warren County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(xvi) Torrance State Hospital, Westmoreland County(A) Renovate the institution, including new construction, alterations, renovations, site improvements, infrastructure upgrades and land acquisitionProject Allocation 100,000,000(10) Department of Military and Veterans Affairs(i) Gettysburg Readiness Center, Adams County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Combined Support Maintenance Shop, West Pittsburgh, Allegheny County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(iii) Pittsburgh Crane Readiness Center, Allegheny County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(iv) Pittsburgh ANG Base (171st ARW), Allegheny County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(v) Southwestern Veterans' Center, Allegheny County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(vi) Ford City Readiness Center, Armstrong County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(vii) Beaver Falls Readiness Center, Beaver County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(viii) Bedford Readiness Center land, Bedford County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new Readiness CenterProject Allocation 5,000,000(ix) Berks County Readiness Centers, Berks County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(x) Hollidaysburg Readiness Center, Blair County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 27,000,000(xi) Bucks County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Bucks County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 77,000,000(xii) Butler Readiness Center, Butler County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(xiii) Cambria County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Cambria County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 45,000,000(xiv) New Cambria Readiness Center, Cambria County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new Readiness CenterProject Allocation 5,000,000(xv) Lehighton Readiness Center, Carbon County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(xvi) Centre County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Centre County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 32,000,000(xvii) State College Army and Air Readiness Center, Centre County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xviii) Chester County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Chester County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 40,000,000(xix) Southeastern Veterans' Center, Spring City, Chester County(A) Construction of new replacement Community Living CenterProject Allocation 14,400,000(B) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 60,000,000(xx) Clearfield Readiness Center, Clearfield County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxi) Lock Haven Readiness Center, Clinton County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 19,000,000(xxii) Crawford County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Crawford County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxiii) Carlisle Readiness Center, Cumberland County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxiv) Cumberland Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Cumberland County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxv) Dauphin County Readiness Centers, Dauphin County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 60,000,000(xxvi) Harrisburg ANG Base (193rd SOW), Dauphin County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(xxvii) Erie Readiness Center, Erie County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 70,000,000(xxviii) Pennsylvania Soldiers' and Sailors' Home, Erie County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xxix) Fayette County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Fayette County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 40,000,000(xxx) Chambersburg Readiness Center, Franklin County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxi) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Franklin County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxii) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Huntingdon County(A) Renovate the facilities, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xxxiii) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Indiana County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 22,000,000(xxxiv) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Jefferson County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xxxv) Carbondale Readiness Center, Lackawanna County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxxvi) Lackawanna County Readiness 20260SB1174PN1455 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Center/Field Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna County(A) Renovate facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxxvii) Scranton Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna County(A) Renovate the facilities, including new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xxxviii) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Lackawanna County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xxxix) Delaware Valley Veterans' Home, Philadelphia County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgrades20260SB1174PN1455 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 10,000,000(xl) Elizabethtown Readiness Center, Lancaster County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 22,000,000(xli) New Castle Readiness Center, Lawrence County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 65,000,000(xlii) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Lawrence County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xliii) Fort Indiantown Gap, Lebanon County(A) Renovate facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security system upgradesProject Allocation 140,000,000(B) Acquisition of privately owned properties within boundaries of Fort Indiantown Gap for training and activities of the installationProject Allocation 8,000,000(C) Purchase in-holdings on Fort Indiantown Gap property and/or surrounding property for Joint Land Use agreements/Army Compatible Use Buffers, including acquisition of landProject Allocation 8,000,000(xliv) Fort Indiantown Gap ANG Base (193rd Ops Group), Lebanon County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(xlv) New Lehigh County Readiness Center, Lehigh County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 20,000,000(xlvi) Allentown Readiness Center, Lehigh County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 70,000,000(xlvii) Luzerne County Readiness Centers, Luzerne County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 75,000,000(xlviii) New Luzerne County Readiness Center, Luzerne County(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 15,000,000(xlix) Williamsport Readiness Center, Lycoming County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(l) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Lycoming County(A) Renovate the facilities, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(li) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, McKean County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(lii) Mercer County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Mercer County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 45,000,000(liii) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Mifflin County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(liv) Montgomery Readiness Centers and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintenance facilities, Montgomery County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 75,000,000(lv) Danville Field Maintenance Building, Montour County(A) Renovate facilities, including new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(lvi) Montour County Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Montour County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 30,000,000(lvii) Easton Readiness Center, Northampton County(A) Renovate facilities, including new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(lviii) Philadelphia County Readiness 20260SB1174PN1455 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Centers, Philadelphia County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 30,000,000(lix) Schuylkill Readiness Center, Schuylkill County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(lx) Friedens Readiness Center, Somerset County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(lxi) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Tioga County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgrades20260SB1174PN1455 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 10,000,000(lxii) Washington County Readiness Centers, Washington County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 17,000,000(lxiii) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Washington County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(lxiv) Honesdale Readiness Center, Wayne County(A) Renovate the Readiness Center, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(lxv) Multiple Readiness Centers and maintenance facilities, Wayne County(A) Renovate the facilities, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(lxvi) Westmoreland County Readiness Centers, Westmoreland County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 55,000,000(lxvii) York County Readiness Centers, York County(A) Renovate the Readiness Centers, including demolition, new construction, correcting structure and infrastructure deficiencies and security system upgradesProject Allocation 10,000,000(lxviii) New Central Pennsylvania Readiness Center(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 10,000,000(lxix) New Northeastern Pennsylvania Readiness Center(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness center20260SB1174PN1455 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,000,000(lxx) New Southeastern Pennsylvania Readiness Center(A) Acquisition of land and/or facilities to build or renovate buildings for a new readiness centerProject Allocation 30,000,000(lxxi) Veterans Homes, Statewide(A) Feasibility study, design and construction of building upgrades. Demolition, renovation, general repairs and expansion, including land development and site infrastructure improvements of the six Veterans Homes Project Allocation 126,000,000(lxxii) Military and Veterans Affairs buildings, Statewide(A) Improvements, including the addition of veterans outreach centers, to provide services in areas that have demonstrated the greatest needProject Allocation 21,000,000(11) State System of Higher Education(i) Commonwealth University(A) Lock Haven University, Clinton County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Lock Haven University, Clinton County. Renovation, new construction, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Stevenson LibraryProject Allocation 25,000,000(C) Bloomsburg University, Columbia County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 30,000,000(D) Bloomsburg University, Columbia County. Renovation, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Andruss LibraryProject Allocation 35,000,000(E) Mansfield University, Tioga County. Provide for deferred maintenance needs and capital renewal repairsProject Allocation 20,000,000(ii) PennWest University(A) Clarion, Clarion County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Clarion, Clarion County. Construction, renovation and acquisition of student housing facilitiesProject Allocation 29,000,000(C) Edinboro, Erie County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 40,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) Edinboro, Erie County. Construction, renovation and acquisition of student housing facilitiesProject Allocation 23,000,000(E) California, Washington County. Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,000(F) California, Washington County. Construction, renovation and acquisition of student housing facilitiesProject Allocation 30,000,000(iii) Kutztown University, Berks County(A) Demolition of underutilized and obsolete buildingsProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Old MainProject Allocation 15,000,000(C) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 35,000,000(iv) Slippery Rock University, Butler County(A) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Eisenberg classroom building20260SB1174PN1455 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 40,000,000(B) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 40,000,000(C) Deferred maintenance needs and capital renewalProject Allocation 20,000,000(v) West Chester University, Chester County(A) Renovation, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to FH Green LibraryProject Allocation 75,000,000(B) Deferred maintenance needs and capital renewalProject Allocation 20,000,000(C) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 40,000,000(vi) Cheyney University, Chester and Delaware Counties(A) Renovation, replacement or upgrades to campus infrastructureProject Allocation 25,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Dudley Center for the Arts Project Allocation 8,000,000(C) Renovations, replacements or upgrades to student housingProject Allocation 25,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) Shippensburg University, Cumberland County(A) Heiges Field House renovation and additionProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 25,000,000(C) Deferred maintenance needs and capital renewalProject Allocation 20,000,000(viii) Indiana University, Indiana County(A) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) New construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades for a new academic commons replacementProject Allocation 45,000,000(C) Renovation, new construction and infrastructure upgrades to academic buildingsProject Allocation 20,000,000(ix) Millersville University, Lancaster County(A) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Pucillo HallProject Allocation 15,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 alterations and infrastructure upgradeProject Allocation 15,000,000(C) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus ADA infrastructureProject Allocation 15,000,000(D) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Biemsderfer StadiumProject Allocation 8,000,000(x) East Stroudsburg University, Monroe County(A) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgrades to Linden HallProject Allocation 40,000,000(B) Renovations, new construction, alterations and infrastructure upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(C) Deferred maintenance needs and capital renewalProject Allocation 15,000,000(xi) State System of Higher Education, systemwide(A) Renovations, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 30,000,000(B) Demolition of underutilized and obsolete buildingsProject Allocation 20,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Campus master planningProject Allocation 24,000,000(12) Office of Administration(i) Commonwealth Technology Center, Dauphin County(A) Miscellaneous replacement of building systems equipment, including mechanical, electrical and plumbing equipmentProject Allocation 11,500,000(B) UPS system replacement. Miscellaneous replacement of building systems equipment, including mechanical, electrical and plumbing equipmentProject Allocation 2,500,000(13) Pennsylvania State Police(i) Pennsylvania State Police Academy, Dauphin County(A) Rehabilitate the Academy Complex, including site acquisition and developmentProject Allocation 163,000,000(ii) Regional forensic laboratory(A) Renovate and/or construct new laboratory in Central Pennsylvania, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 90,500,000(iii) Statewide(A) Capital renewal of facilities and new 20260SB1174PN1455 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction, including site and building improvements, interior renovations, building system upgrades, code-required improvements, security enhancements such as perimeter fencing and upgrade or replacement of fueling stations, including, if applicable, establishment of electric vehicle charging stationsProject Allocation 200,000,000(B) Land acquisition or purchase of facility to replace buildings or provide new facilities to further the mission of the Pennsylvania State Police, to include exercising an option to purchase real property contained in a lease that was fully executed before the effective date of this statute, and deemed in the best interest of the Commonwealth and Pennsylvania State PoliceProject Allocation 250,000,000(14) Department of Transportation(i) Adams County(A) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Maintenance facility - generator. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - county office. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 30,200,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 3,780,000(F) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle winter material salt storage building. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(ii) Allegheny County(A) District office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 4,000,000(B) District office. Provide for renovation and expansion for code compliance, upgraded building systems, improved program requirements and energy efficiency at District Office 11-0Project Allocation 30,800,000(C) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 112 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,400,000(D) Fleet Management (Western). New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing western training facility, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 10,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 7,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - county office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing maintenance facility, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work at Fort Pitt TunnelProject Allocation 13,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 113 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (G) Maintenance facility - county office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing maintenance facility, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work at Liberty TunnelProject Allocation 13,000,000(H) Maintenance facility - county office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing maintenance facility, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work at Squirrel Hill TunnelProject Allocation 13,000,000(I) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,875,000(J) Maintenance facility - county office. Super garage. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility to combine the Allegheny, Beaver and Fort Pitt Tunnel maintenance units 20260SB1174PN1455 - 114 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 into a combined garage and administration building, including auxiliary buildings. May include site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 125,000,000(K) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 2,000,000(L) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace or upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(M) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace or upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systems at Fort Pitt, Liberty and Squirrel Hill Tunnel facilitiesProject Allocation 3,000,000(N) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program 20260SB1174PN1455 - 115 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirementsProject Allocation 9,000,000(O) Maintenance facility winter material salt storage building. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of 12 salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 21,000,000(P) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 4,500,000(Q) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades to Site # 11, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(R) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades to Site # 12, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(iii) Armstrong County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 116 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 49,850,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace or upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20260SB1174PN1455 - 117 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 17,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 17,200,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. This project will provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(iv) Beaver County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 118 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 22,450,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 3,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildings20260SB1174PN1455 - 119 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(v) Bedford County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 7,075,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildings20260SB1174PN1455 - 120 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 3,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Develop new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 8,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Demolish existing, construct new, upgrade/renovate or replace 10 winter material storage buildings and replacement if applicable of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 21,300,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(vi) Berks County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 121 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 29,775,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new 20260SB1174PN1455 - 122 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Weigh station. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of a Transportation/Pennsylvania State Police inspection facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 60,000,000(vii) Blair County(A) District office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 4,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 123 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) District office. Provide for renovation and expansion for code compliance, upgraded building systems, improved program requirements and energy efficiency at District Office 9-0Project Allocation 41,000,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 44,000,000(E) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 3,500,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 124 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(G) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 3,335,000(H) Maintenance facility - winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(I) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(viii) Bradford County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card 20260SB1174PN1455 - 125 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 55,425,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile 20260SB1174PN1455 - 126 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(ix) Bucks County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or 20260SB1174PN1455 - 127 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 51,000,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 128 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(H) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site P, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 10,157,000(I) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades to Rest Site P, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(J) Welcome Center. Renovate and expand Welcome Center Site P, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 40,000,000(x) Butler County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 129 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 31,605,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new 20260SB1174PN1455 - 130 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(xi) Cambria County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 131 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 32,425,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirements. Replace 20260SB1174PN1455 - 132 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Patton Leased SPProject Allocation 8,000,000(G) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirements. Replace Johnston Leased SPProject Allocation 8,000,000(H) Maintenance facility - winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(I) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(xii) Cameron County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add 20260SB1174PN1455 - 133 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 28,825,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirements20260SB1174PN1455 - 134 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 12,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(xiii) Carbon County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition 20260SB1174PN1455 - 135 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 51,000,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(G) Paint truck storage building. The proposed new line painting truck 20260SB1174PN1455 - 136 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintenance building for traffic line painting operationsProject Allocation 3,000,000(xiv) Centre County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 12,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 137 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 14,800,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(H) Rest area facility. Facility security updates at Rest Site 29, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other 20260SB1174PN1455 - 138 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(I) Rest area facility. Facility security updates at Rest Site 30, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xv) Chester County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 46,500,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct 20260SB1174PN1455 - 139 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Demolish existing, construct new, upgrade/renovate or replace 10 winter material storage buildings, and replacement if applicable of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 18,500,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 140 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xvi) Clarion County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 33,238,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 141 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(xvii) Clearfield County(A) District office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 4,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 142 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) District office. For site acquisition and development, design, utilities and new construction or renovation and expansion of existing district office for code compliance, upgraded building systems, improved program requirements and energy efficiencyProject Allocation 41,000,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 21,700,000(E) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical 20260SB1174PN1455 - 143 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(G) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(xviii) Clinton County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire 20260SB1174PN1455 - 144 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 39,500,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 145 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(H) Rest area facility. Facility security updates at Rest Site 33, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(I) Rest area facility. Facility security updates at Rest Site 34, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(J) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 33, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgrades20260SB1174PN1455 - 146 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 16,000,000(K) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 34, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 16,000,000(xix) Columbia County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 20,500,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four 20260SB1174PN1455 - 147 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(H) Rest area facility. Facility security updates at Rest Site 37, including security camera systems, security card 20260SB1174PN1455 - 148 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(I) Rest area facility. Facility security updates at Rest Site 38, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(J) Rest area facility. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing roadside rest area at Site 37, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 16,000,000(K) Rest area facility. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing roadside rest area at Site 38, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 16,000,000(xx) Crawford County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step 20260SB1174PN1455 - 149 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 16,025,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 4,650,000(E) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical 20260SB1174PN1455 - 150 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(G) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 4,500,000(I) Rest area facility. Facility security updates at Rest Site 19, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(J) Rest area facility. Facility security updates at Rest Site 20, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 151 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxi) Cumberland County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 23,500,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 3,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 152 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(H) Rest area facility. Facility security updates at Rest Site 45, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and grounds20260SB1174PN1455 - 153 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,000,000(I) Rest area facility. Facility security updates at Rest Site 46, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(J) Rest area facility. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing roadside rest area at Site 45, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 16,000,000(K) Rest area facility. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing roadside rest area at Site 46, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 16,000,000(xxii) Dauphin County(A) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 4,000,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 154 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 39,000,000(C) Fleet management facility. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 4,000,000(D) Fleet management facility. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 28,500,000(E) Keystone Building. To provide for the reorganization of Transportation Offices to meet changing program needsProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - county office. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 155 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(G) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 18,700,000(H) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 2,500,000(I) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(J) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20260SB1174PN1455 - 156 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 16,000,000(K) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 17,200,000(L) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(M) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipment for Elizabethville #2 StockpileProject Allocation 3,500,000(N) Materials testing laboratory. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add 20260SB1174PN1455 - 157 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(O) Materials testing laboratory. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 25,000,000(P) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 48, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area buildingProject Allocation 1,000,000(Q) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 47, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area buildingProject Allocation 1,000,000(R) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 47, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step 20260SB1174PN1455 - 158 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(S) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 48, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,000,000(T) Sign shop facility. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 26,000,000(U) Sign shop facility. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,000,000(V) Server farm facility. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will 20260SB1174PN1455 - 159 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 4,000,000(xxiii) Delaware County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 43,000,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 160 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 14,000,000(F) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 4,500,000(G) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds - Site N and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 161 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (H) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site N, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 35,450,000(xxiv) Elk County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 48,500,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildings20260SB1174PN1455 - 162 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(xxv) Erie County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systems20260SB1174PN1455 - 163 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 30,638,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 6,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 2,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the 20260SB1174PN1455 - 164 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 4,500,000(H) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site L, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area buildingProject Allocation 1,000,000(I) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site L, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 14,000,000(J) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site L, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 36,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 165 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (K) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site M, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 20,000,000(L) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds - Site M and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(xxvi) Fayette County(A) District office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 4,000,000(B) District office. New construction, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 166 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 41,000,000(C) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(D) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(E) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 41,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 167 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (F) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(G) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(H) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 14,000,000(I) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(J) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 168 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxvii) Forest County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 17,500,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 169 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(xxviii) Franklin County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 170 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 15,625,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 7,560,000(F) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 171 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 16,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(H) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds - Site G and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(I) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site G, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 34,500,000(xxix) Fulton County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 172 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 22,075,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new 20260SB1174PN1455 - 173 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(H) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 3, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(I) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 3, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgrades20260SB1174PN1455 - 174 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 10,000,000(J) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds - Site B and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(K) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site B, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 22,450,000(xxx) Greene County(A) Driver Licensing Center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card 20260SB1174PN1455 - 175 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 48,100,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile 20260SB1174PN1455 - 176 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 9,000,000(G) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(I) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds - Site D and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(J) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site D, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 177 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 32,200,000(xxxi) Huntingdon County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 21,770,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 178 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(xxxii) Indiana County(A) District office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection 20260SB1174PN1455 - 179 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 4,000,000(B) District office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 40,150,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 27,603,000(E) General storage buildings. Construct 20260SB1174PN1455 - 180 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(G) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 8,950,000(H) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 17,500,000(I) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 4,500,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 181 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxxiii) Jefferson County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 37,350,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 182 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 4,500,000(H) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 25, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(I) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 26, including roof replacement, building systems 20260SB1174PN1455 - 183 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(J) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 25, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(K) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 26, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxiv) Juniata County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 184 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,750,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing 20260SB1174PN1455 - 185 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 containment structuresProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxv) Lackawanna County(A) District office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 4,000,000(B) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 37,000,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 186 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 22,285,000(E) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(G) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirements20260SB1174PN1455 - 187 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 12,000,000(H) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 13,000,000(I) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(J) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 55, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(K) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 55, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 15,000,000(xxxvi) Lancaster County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 188 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 48,400,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20260SB1174PN1455 - 189 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 3,780,000(F) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 18,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(xxxvii) Lawrence County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other 20260SB1174PN1455 - 190 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 22,275,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program 20260SB1174PN1455 - 191 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirementsProject Allocation 9,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(H) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 18,500,000(I) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 15, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(J) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 16, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxviii) Lebanon County20260SB1174PN1455 - 192 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) Fleet management (Eastern). New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing Eastern training facility, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 10,000,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 193 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 utility workProject Allocation 26,925,000(E) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(G) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(H) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 13,000,000(I) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or 20260SB1174PN1455 - 194 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 4,650,000(xxxix) Lehigh County(A) District office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 4,000,000(B) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 40,425,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 195 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 27,550,000(E) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(G) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(H) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 196 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 18,000,000(I) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(xl) Luzerne County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 44,000,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for 20260SB1174PN1455 - 197 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 9,780,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of up to 10 salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 16,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(H) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 39, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 198 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(I) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 53, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(J) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 54, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xli) Lycoming County(A) District office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 4,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 199 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility work Project Allocation 38,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 28,125,000(E) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - generator. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 200 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(G) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(H) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(I) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(xlii) McKean County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 201 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 30,125,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirements20260SB1174PN1455 - 202 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 18,500,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(xliii) Mercer County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire 20260SB1174PN1455 - 203 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 29,000,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(G) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 204 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(I) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 17, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 5,000,000(J) Rest area facility. Renovate and expand Rest Site 18, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 2,500,000(K) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 17, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and grounds20260SB1174PN1455 - 205 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,000,000(L) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 18, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(M) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds - Site E and fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(N) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site E, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 30,225,000(xliv) Mifflin County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building 20260SB1174PN1455 - 206 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 48,325,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 207 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(G) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(xlv) Monroe County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire 20260SB1174PN1455 - 208 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 41,050,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 209 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(H) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area 41 building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(I) Rest area facility. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing roadside rest area at Site 41, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 16,000,000(J) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center 20260SB1174PN1455 - 210 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 building and grounds - Site F and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(K) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site F, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgrades, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 36,500,000(xlvi) Montgomery County(A) District office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 4,000,000(B) District office. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing district office, including site acquisition and development, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 211 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 41,260,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(D) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 41,100,000(E) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical system20260SB1174PN1455 - 212 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 3,000,000(G) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(H) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of 10 salt storage buildings and replacement if applicable of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 18,500,000(I) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 8,500,000(J) Parking garage. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing parking garage at the District 6 Engineering Office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 14,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 213 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (K) Regional traffic management center. New construction, renovations, expansion and alterations to existing regional traffic management center at the District 6 Engineering Office, including site acquisition and development, design, construction and utility workProject Allocation 70,000,000(L) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(xlvii) Montour County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 33,800,000(B) General storage buildings. Construct 20260SB1174PN1455 - 214 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(C) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(E) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(F) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Rest Area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 215 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (G) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 36, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlviii) Northampton County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,425,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildings20260SB1174PN1455 - 216 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 11,500,000(F) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(H) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security 20260SB1174PN1455 - 217 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds and facility fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(xlix) Northumberland County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 21,425,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 218 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(l) Perry County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 219 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 49,000,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirements20260SB1174PN1455 - 220 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 8,000,000(F) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(li) Philadelphia County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 221 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 utility workProject Allocation 37,000,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 222 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(H) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Design, construction and general improvements to all Philadelphia Regional Port Authority properties, including new land acquisitionProject Allocation 260,000,000(I) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Maintenance dredging of all Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilities, including permitting activitiesProject Allocation 60,000,000(J) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Sustainability/resiliency at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilitiesProject Allocation 100,000,000(K) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. General improvements, including acquisition and development of infrastructure to support the handling of both general and passenger cargo at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilitiesProject Allocation 160,600,000(L) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Container capacity development at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority 20260SB1174PN1455 - 223 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilitiesProject Allocation 244,000,000(M) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Acquisition of Ship to Store Cranes for use at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilitiesProject Allocation 85,800,000(N) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. Berth development at Philadelphia Regional Port Authority facilities, including capital dredgingProject Allocation 137,500,000(O) Philadelphia Regional Port Authority. General improvements to the Tioga Marine Terminal infrastructure and adjacent properties, including berth rehabilitation, two container cranes and warehouse developmentProject Allocation 125,000,000(lii) Pike County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 224 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 37,800,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of 20260SB1174PN1455 - 225 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(H) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 61, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(I) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 62, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(J) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds - Site K and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire 20260SB1174PN1455 - 226 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(K) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site K, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 33,850,000(liii) Potter County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 14,900,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct 20260SB1174PN1455 - 227 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(liv) Schuylkill County20260SB1174PN1455 - 228 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 41,850,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 229 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(G) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(lv) Snyder County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step 20260SB1174PN1455 - 230 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 46,500,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical 20260SB1174PN1455 - 231 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(G) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(lvi) Somerset County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 232 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 29,500,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20260SB1174PN1455 - 233 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 9,000,000(G) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of 14 salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 18,000,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(lvii) Sullivan County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to 20260SB1174PN1455 - 234 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 36,000,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 235 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(lviii) Susquehanna County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 31,650,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 236 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 4,500,000(H) Rest area facility. Facility security upgrades at Site 56, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area 20260SB1174PN1455 - 237 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(I) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds - Site H and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(J) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site H, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 33,180,000(lix) Tioga County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systems20260SB1174PN1455 - 238 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 23,825,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for 20260SB1174PN1455 - 239 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 18,500,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(H) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds - Site T and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(I) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site T, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 34,500,000(lx) Union County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including 20260SB1174PN1455 - 240 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 42,000,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new 20260SB1174PN1455 - 241 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(lxi) Venango County(A) District office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 4,000,000(B) District office. Provide for renovation and expansion for code compliance, upgraded building systems, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 242 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 improved program requirements and energy efficiency at District Office 1-0Project Allocation 37,000,000(C) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(D) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(E) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 28,925,000(F) General storage buildings. Construct 20260SB1174PN1455 - 243 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(G) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(H) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(I) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(J) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(K) Rest area facility. Facility security 20260SB1174PN1455 - 244 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 updates at Site 21, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(L) Rest area facility. Facility security updates at Site 22, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the rest area building and groundsProject Allocation 1,000,000(lxii) Warren County(A) Driver licensing center. Renovate, construct new and expand, including roof replacement, upgrade building systems, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 25,750,000(B) District office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systems20260SB1174PN1455 - 245 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 3,500,000(C) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 29,925,000(D) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(G) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt 20260SB1174PN1455 - 246 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 17,500,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(lxiii) Washington County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 28,250,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct 20260SB1174PN1455 - 247 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 15,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Replace salt storage building, including demolition of existing salt building and demolition and replacement of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 18,500,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 248 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (H) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds - Site A and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(I) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site A, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 34,000,000(lxiv) Wayne County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 249 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 20,600,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildings20260SB1174PN1455 - 250 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 4,500,000(lxv) Westmoreland County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 23,200,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildings20260SB1174PN1455 - 251 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 4,800,000(F) Winter material storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of eight salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 13,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 5,000,000(lxvi) Wyoming County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card 20260SB1174PN1455 - 252 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 22,040,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile 20260SB1174PN1455 - 253 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 12,000,000(F) Winter material salt storage building. Construct new, upgrade or replace. This project will provide for the construction or renovation of four salt storage buildingsProject Allocation 8,000,000(G) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(lxvii) York County(A) Maintenance facility - county office. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the facility and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 3,500,000(B) Maintenance facility - county office. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of facility, including site 20260SB1174PN1455 - 254 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility workProject Allocation 38,550,000(C) General storage buildings. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction or renovation of four general storage buildingsProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) Maintenance facility - generator. Renovate, expand, replace, upgrade facilities, back-up generator, switchgear, transformer and electrical systemProject Allocation 3,000,000(E) Maintenance facility - stockpile. Construct new, upgrade or replace to provide for the construction of a new or renovation of an existing stockpile facility to meet code and program requirementsProject Allocation 6,780,000(F) Welcome Center. Renovate, expand or replace Welcome Center Site J, including roof replacement, building systems upgrades, sidewalks, curbing, step replacement, parking lot upgrades and sewage plant upgradesProject Allocation 7,000,000(G) Winter material storage building. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 255 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Demolish existing, construct new, upgrade/renovate or replace eight winter material storage buildings and and replacement if applicable of liquid de-icing containment structuresProject Allocation 15,500,000(H) Maintenance vehicle wash facility. Construct new or retrofit to provide for the new construction or retrofitting of facility, including site work, utilities and equipmentProject Allocation 3,500,000(I) Welcome Center. Facility security upgrades, including security camera systems, security card access and badge readers and any other security measures of the Welcome Center building and grounds - Site J and facility fire protection systems, add new or upgrade building fire protection systems, including fire alarms and sprinkler systemsProject Allocation 2,000,000(lxvii.1) Multicounty(A) District Office/County Maintenance Office and garage/Real ID Driver Licensing Center. Combining the District 5 Engineering Office and County Maintenance Offices in the District 5 region, including Berks, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 256 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Schuylkill, Lehigh, Carbon, Monroe and Northampton County Maintenance Office and garage facilities, including associated stockpiles, into one combined facility complex, including a Real ID Driver Licensing and Vehicle Service Center, including the demolition of existing structures, construction of new district and county maintenance offices and garage facilities, Driver Licensing and Vehicle Service Center, including auxiliary support buildings. The project may include site acquisition, land development, design and construction of buildings, utility infrastructure, roadways and security systems to meet PennDOT operational needsProject Allocation 500,000,000(B) District Office, Lehigh, Carbon, Monroe, Northampton, Schuylkill and Berks Counties. Replacement of the District 5 Engineering Office, including the construction of auxiliary support buildings. The project may include site acquisition, land development, design and construction of buildings and utility infrastructure20260SB1174PN1455 - 257 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 100,000,000(lxviii) Statewide(A) Weigh stations. Construct new, upgrade, replace to provide for the construction or renovation of Transportation/Pennsylvania State Police inspection facilities, including site acquisition and development, design and construction of buildings and utility work. Construction of six facilities StatewideProject Allocation 360,000,000(B) Intercity passenger and freight rail. Rehabilitate or construct intercity passenger and freight rail infrastructure, including bridges, to accommodate current and future demandsProject Allocation 75,000,000(15) Department of Health(i) Bureau of Laboratories, Dauphin County(A) Construct new laboratory, including site and infrastructure improvements and land acquisitionProject Allocation 60,000,000Section 4. Itemization of furniture and equipment projects.Additional capital projects in the category of public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition of movable furniture and equipment to complete public improvement projects and to be purchased by the Department of General Services, its 20260SB1174PN1455 - 258 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their estimated financial cost, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Department of Agriculture (Reserved)(2) Department of Conservation and Natural Resources(i) Point State Park, Allegheny County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for park office renovationsProject Allocation 819,000(ii) Delaware Canal State Park, Bucks County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for new resource center with storage buildingProject Allocation 1,000,000(iii) Gallitzin State Forest, Cambria County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for new district officeProject Allocation 750,000(iv) Big Elk Creek State Park, Chester County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for State Park Development Phase 2Project Allocation 2,000,000(v) Forestry Lab, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for new laboratoryProject Allocation 3,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 259 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) Geologic Survey Headquarters, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for new headquarters of the Bureau of Geologic SurveyProject Allocation 2,000,000(vii) Laurel Caverns State Park, Fayette County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for Park Development Phase 2Project Allocation 2,000,000(viii) Pinchot State Forest, Luzerne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for Pinchot Forest District resource management center complexProject Allocation 875,000(ix) Maurice K. Goddard State Park, Mercer County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for redevelopment of park facilitiesProject Allocation 750,000(x) Denten Hill State Park, Potter County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for redevelopment of park facilitiesProject Allocation 5,000,000(xi) Vosburg Neck State Park, Wyoming County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for State Park Development 20260SB1174PN1455 - 260 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Phase 2Project Allocation 2,000,000(xii) Susquehanna Riverlands State Park, York County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for State Park Development Phase 2Project Allocation 2,000,000(xiii) Training Academy and Range, Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for Bureau of State Parks Training Academy infrastructure and rangeProject Allocation 2,000,000(3) Department of Corrections(i) State Correctional Institution at Benner, Centre County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,500,000(ii) State Correctional Institution at Houtzdale, Clearfield County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,500,000(iii) State Correctional Institution at Cambridge Springs, Crawford County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 261 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) State Correctional Institution at Camp Hill, Cumberland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 15,000,000(v) State Correctional Institution at Chester, Delaware County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(vi) State Correctional Institution at Forest, Forest County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(vii) State Correctional Institution at Pine Grove, Indiana County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(viii) State Correctional Institution at Elizabethtown Training Academy, Lancaster County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 5,000,000(ix) State Correctional Institution at Muncy, Lycoming County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovations20260SB1174PN1455 - 262 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 8,000,000(x) State Correctional Institution at Mercer, Mercer County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xi) State Correctional Institution at Phoenix, Montgomery County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,050,000(xii) State Correctional Institution at Coal Township, Northumberland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,000,000(xiii) State Correctional Institution at Frackville, Schuylkill County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 500,000(xiv) State Correctional Institution at Mahanoy, Schuylkill County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,500,000(xv) State Correctional Institution at Waymart, Wayne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovations20260SB1174PN1455 - 263 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 4,000,000(4) Department of Education(i) The Pennsylvania State University(A) Chiller unit - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Former Palmer Museum of Art - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 7,000,000(C) FRONTIER (Forging a Renaissance of Nuclear Through Innovation, Entrepreneurship, and Research) - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture, fixtures and equipment for FRONTIER at Penn State University ParkProject Allocation 5,000,000(D) General academic building - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 15,000,000(E) General research building - University Park, Centre County. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 264 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 15,000,000(F) Greenhouse and headhouse complexes relocation (PlantWorks) - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture, fixtures and equipment for the relocation of the greenhouse and headhouse complexes, also known as PlantWorks, at Penn State University ParkProject Allocation 20,000,000(G) Millennium Science Complex II - University Park, Centre County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 20,000,000(H) Stone Valley Forestry Building - University Park, Huntingdon County. Original furniture and equipment for new space or addition to and/or renovation of existing spaceProject Allocation 1,000,000(I) Sustainable Energy and Environmental Innovation Complex - University Park, Huntingdon County. Original furniture, fixtures and equipment for the Sustainable Energy and Environmental 20260SB1174PN1455 - 265 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Innovation Complex at Penn State University ParkProject Allocation 20,000,000(ii) Temple University(A) University facilities, Philadelphia County. Original furniture, fixtures and equipment for facilitiesProject Allocation 20,000,000(iii) Lincoln University(A) 3020 Market Street, University City District, Philadelphia County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 1,500,000(B) Athletics Dome, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 1,500,000(C) Center for Black Culture, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 4,000,000(D) Cresson Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 2,000,000(E) Faculty and staff housing upgrades, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for upgrades and improvements20260SB1174PN1455 - 266 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 2,000,000(F) Heritage Center, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 1,000,000(G) Houston Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationProject Allocation 3,000,000(H) Lincoln Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationProject Allocation 4,000,000(I) Manuel Rivero (Hall) Gymnasium, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 14,000,000(J) Mary Dod Brown Chapel, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovation and additionProject Allocation 1,500,000(K) McCauley Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,500,000(L) McRary Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,500,000(M) Nelson Science Center, Chester 20260SB1174PN1455 - 267 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County. Original furniture and equipment for upgrades and improvementsProject Allocation 1,250,000(N) New residence hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for new residence hallProject Allocation 5,000,000(O) Physical plant, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for new residence hallProject Allocation 6,000,000(P) Quad housing, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for Quad housingProject Allocation 5,000,000(Q) Rendall Hall, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for new residence hallProject Allocation 4,000,000(R) Social sciences building. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 6,000,000(S) Renovation and Expansion of Alumni House, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 5,000,000(T) University Hall, Chester County. 20260SB1174PN1455 - 268 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 4,000,000(U) Ware Center for the Performing Arts, Chester County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 4,000,000(iv) Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology(A) Community Learning Center, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Dormitories, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 5,000,000(C) Hartzell Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 3,000,000(D) Jones Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 6,000,000(E) Leonard Hall, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovationsProject Allocation 3,000,000(F) Mellor Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for 20260SB1174PN1455 - 269 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renovationsProject Allocation 6,000,000(G) New multipurpose building/dormitory, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for additionProject Allocation 6,000,000(H) Schwalm Building, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovations and additionProject Allocation 4,500,000(I) Snyder Hall/Woolworth, Lancaster County. Original furniture and equipment for renovations and additionProject Allocation 5,000,000(5) Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency(i) Special Operations Center, Dauphin County(A) Construction of a state-of-the-art training facility, including land acquisition, site development and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 25,000,000(ii) Western Area Office, Indiana County(A) Construction of a state-of-the-art emergency operations and coordination center in the western area of this Commonwealth, including land acquisition, site development and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 3,000,000(iii) State Fire Academy, Mifflin County20260SB1174PN1455 - 270 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Construction of a state-of-the-art training facility, including land acquisition, site development and infrastructure improvementsProject Allocation 4,000,000(6) Department of Environmental Protection (Reserved)(7) Department of General Services(i) Rachel Carson State Office Building, Dauphin County(A) Provide new fixtures, furnishings and equipment for the Rachel Carson BuildingProject Allocation 20,000,000(ii) Statewide(A) Furniture, fixtures and equipment for space consolidation efforts in Commonwealth-owned buildingsProject Allocation 100,000,000(8) Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission(i) State Museum of Pennsylvania, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovated State MuseumProject Allocation 20,000,000(B) Furniture and equipment for renovation of the State Museum of PHMC TowerProject Allocation 10,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 271 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Landis Valley Village and Farm Museum, Lancaster County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovated Visitor CenterProject Allocation 2,000,000(9) Department of Human Services(i) Wernersville State Hospital, Franklin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(ii) Western Secure Treatment Unit, Butler County(A) Equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(iii) Ebensburg Center, Cambria County(A) Provide fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(iv) South Mountain Restoration Center, Franklin County(A) Provide fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(v) South Mountain Secure Treatment Unit, Franklin County20260SB1174PN1455 - 272 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(vi) Youth Forestry Camp No. 3, Huntingdon County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(vii) Clarks Summit State Hospital, Lackawanna County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(viii) North East Secure Treatment Unit, Luzerne County(A) Equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(ix) Norristown State Hospital, Montgomery County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 30,000,000(x) South East Youth Development Center, Montgomery County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation 20260SB1174PN1455 - 273 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xi) Danville State Hospital, Montour County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xii) North Central Secure Treatment Unit, Montour County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xiii) Loysville Youth Development Center, Perry County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xiv) Selinsgrove Center, Snyder County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xv) Warren State Hospital, Warren County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(xvi) Torrance State Hospital, Westmoreland 20260SB1174PN1455 - 274 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County(A) Fixtures, furnishings and equipment to support building renovation projectsProject Allocation 10,000,000(10) Department of Military and Veterans Affairs(i) Gettysburg Readiness Center, Adams County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(ii) Combined Support Maintenance Shop, West Pittsburgh, Allegheny County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(iii) Pittsburgh Crane Readiness Center, Allegheny County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(iv) Pittsburgh ANG Base (171st ARW), Allegheny County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(v) Southwestern Veterans' Center, Allegheny County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 275 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) Ford City Readiness Center, Armstrong County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(vii) Beaver Falls Readiness Center, Beaver County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(viii) Berks County Readiness Center, Berks County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(ix) Hollidaysburg Readiness Center, Blair County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(x) Bucks County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Bucks County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 7,000,000(xi) Butler Readiness Center, Butler County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xii) Cambria County Readiness Centers and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 276 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Maintenance Facilities, Cambria County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 2,000,000(xiii) Lehighton Readiness Center, Carbon County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xiv) Centre County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Centre County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 2,000,000(xv) State College Army and Air Readiness Center, Centre County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xvi) Chester County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Chester County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 4,000,000(xvii) Southeastern Veterans' Center, Chester County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 2,000,000(xviii) Clearfield Readiness Center, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 277 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Clearfield County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xix) Lock Haven Readiness Center, Clinton County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xx) Crawford County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Crawford County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxi) Carlisle Readiness Center, Cumberland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxii) Cumberland County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Cumberland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxiii) Dauphin County Readiness Centers, Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 278 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxiv) Harrisburg ANG Base (193rd SOW), Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxv) Erie Readiness Center, Erie County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxvi) Pennsylvania Soldiers' and Sailors' Home, Erie County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxvii) Fayette County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Fayette County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 4,000,000(xxviii) Chambersburg Readiness Center, Franklin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxix) Franklin County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Franklin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxx) Huntingdon County Readiness Centers and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 279 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Maintenance Facilities, Huntingdon County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxi) Indiana Readiness Center, Indiana County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxii) Indiana County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Indiana County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxiii) Jefferson County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Jefferson County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxiv) Carbondale Readiness Center, Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxv) Lackawanna County Readiness Center/Field Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment20260SB1174PN1455 - 280 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,000,000(xxxvi) Scranton Maintenance Shop, Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxvii) Lackawanna County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxviii) Delaware Valley Veterans' Home, Philadelphia County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xxxix) Elizabethtown Readiness Center, Lancaster County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xl) New Castle Readiness Center, Lawrence County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xli) Lawrence County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Lawrence County(A) Provide original furniture and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 281 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlii) Fort Indiantown Gap, Lebanon County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 3,000,000(xliii) Fort Indiantown Gap ANG Base (193rd Ops Grp), Lebanon County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xliv) Allentown Readiness Center, Lehigh County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlv) Luzerne County Readiness Centers, Luzerne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 2,000,000(xlvi) Williamsport Readiness Center, Lycoming County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlvii) Lycoming County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Lycoming County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment20260SB1174PN1455 - 282 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,000,000(xlviii) McKean County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, McKean County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(xlix) Mercer County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities , Mercer County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 2,000,000(l) Mifflin County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Mifflin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(li) Montgomery County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Montgomery County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 6,000,000(lii) Danville Field Maintenance Building, Montour County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(liii) Montour County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Montour County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment20260SB1174PN1455 - 283 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 3,000,000(liv) Easton Readiness Center, Northampton County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lv) Philadelphia County Readiness Centers, Philadelphia County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lvi) Schuylkill Readiness Center, Schuylkill County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lvii) Friedens Readiness Centers, Somerset County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lviii) Tioga County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Tioga County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lix) Washington Readiness Center, Washington County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment20260SB1174PN1455 - 284 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 1,000,000(lx) Washington County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Washington County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lxi) Honesdale Readiness Center, Wayne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lxii) Wayne County Readiness Centers and Maintenance Facilities, Wayne County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lxiii) Westmoreland County Readiness Centers, Westmoreland County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lxiv) York County Readiness Centers, York County(A) Provide original furniture and equipmentProject Allocation 1,000,000(lxv) Veterans Homes, Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovations to six Veterans Homes20260SB1174PN1455 - 285 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 3,000,000(lxvi) Veterans Homes, Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for renovations to six Veterans HomesProject Allocation 5,000,000(11) State System of Higher Education(i) Commonwealth University(A) Lock Haven University, Clinton County. Original furniture and equipment for Stevenson LibraryProject Allocation 3,000,000(ii) PennWest University(A) Edinboro, Erie County. Original furniture and equipment for Wiley HallProject Allocation 1,500,000(iii) Kutztown University, Berks County(A) Original furniture and equipment for Beekey Education BuildingProject Allocation 2,000,000(B) Original furniture and equipment for Keystone Hall/fieldhouse upgradesProject Allocation 1,000,000(iv) West Chester University, Chester County(A) Renovation, replacement or upgrade of campus infrastructureProject Allocation 4,000,000(v) Cheyney University, Chester and Delaware Counties(A) Original furniture and equipment for 20260SB1174PN1455 - 286 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Ada Georges Dining HallProject Allocation 4,100,000(vi) Indiana University, Indiana County(A) Original furniture and equipment for academic buildingProject Allocation 6,800,000(vii) Millersville University, Lancaster County(A) Original furniture and equipment for Pucillo HallProject Allocation 1,700,000(B) Original furniture and equipment for Brooks Hall renovation to become Lombardo College of BusinessProject Allocation 1,000,000(C) Original furniture and equipment for academic buildingProject Allocation 2,000,000(viii) PASSHE, Systemwide - Berks, Chester, Delaware, Cumberland, Indiana, Lancaster, Monroe, Columbia, Tioga, Erie, Washington, Clarion, Butler and Clinton Counties(A) Original furniture and equipment for capital renewalProject Allocation 10,000,000(12) Office of Administration (Reserved)(13) Pennsylvania State Police(i) Statewide(A) Provide original furniture and equipment20260SB1174PN1455 - 287 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 100,000,000(14) Department of Transportation(i) Dauphin County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for manufacturing - Sign ShopProject Allocation 4,000,000(ii) Lackawanna County(A) Provide original furniture and equipment for maintenance facilityProject Allocation 600,000Section 5. Itemization of transportation assistance projects.(a) Mass transit.--Additional capital projects in the category of transportation assistance projects for mass transit in which an interest is to be acquired or constructed by the Department of Transportation, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Allegheny County(i) Pittsburgh Regional Transit(A) Bus and rail overhaul program. Overhaul of existing bus and rail car assetsProject Allocation 50,000,000(B) Bus replacement program. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to replace buses.Project Allocation 50,000,00020260SB1174PN1455 - 288 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) Homestead to McKeesport. An on-street bus transit improvement project between Homestead and McKeesport to focus on rider safety and accessibilityProject Allocation 60,000,000(D) Infrastructure Safety Renewal Program. Improvements to stations, signals, track, power, fixed guideways, bridges, tunnels, incline and operating/maintenance facilitiesProject Allocation 50,000,000(E) ITS Hardware/Software Program. Hardware and software for intelligent station real time signage, including information technology infrastructure and enterprise softwareProject Allocation 50,000,000(F) New bus operating facility. This project will provides Pittsburgh Regional Transit a new operating facility with the capacity of 230 buses, and supports both diesel and electric busesProject Allocation 236,000,000(G) New light rail vehicles. Purchase 50 new light rail vehiclesProject Allocation 310,000,000(H) New operating facility. This project will provide Pittsburgh Regional 20260SB1174PN1455 - 289 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Transit an expansion of its existing vehicle storage and maintenance facilitiesProject Allocation 220,000,000(I) Transit centers. Pittsburgh Regional Transit is preparing a study of the Central Business District's bus networkProject Allocation 66,000,000(2) Bucks, Chester, Delaware, Montgomery and Philadelphia Counties(i) Southeastern Pennsylvania Transportation Authority(A) Urbanized Area Formula Program of Projects. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to replace buses and rehabilitate or replace various facilities and infrastructure to improve the system and bring assets to a state of good repairProject Allocation 150,000,000(B) Federal State of Good Repair Program. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to rehabilitate or replace existing facilities, vehicles and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 220,000,000(C) Bus and Bus Facilities Program. Provide funds to match Federal capital 20260SB1174PN1455 - 290 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 funding to rehabilitate or replace existing bus facilities and vehicles to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 70,000,000(D) Bus Purchase Flex Program. Provide funds to match Federal capital funding to replace buses and rehabilitate or replace various facilities and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 50,000,000(E) Federal Grant Program. Projects include vehicle purchases and overhauls; signal system modernization; accessibility, stations and parking; new payment technologies, system improvements and state-of-good-repair initiativesProject Allocation 300,000,000(F) Infrastructure Safety Renewal Program. Rehabilitate or replace existing facilities and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good repairProject Allocation 350,000,000(G) State of Good Repair Program. Rehabilitate or replace existing facilities and infrastructure to bring them to a state of good repair20260SB1174PN1455 - 291 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 110,000,000(H) System Improvements Program. Improve transit service in Southeastern PennsylvaniaProject Allocation 150,000,000(3) Statewide(i) Pennsylvania Department of Transportation (PennDOT)(A) Facility, vehicle and capital equipment program. Provide funding match for the design and construction of facilities, purchase of transit vehicles, capital equipment and other infrastructure across this CommonwealthProject Allocation 75,000,000(B) Shared ride facility program. Provide funding match for the design and construction of shared ride facilities across this CommonwealthProject Allocation 25,000,000(C) Alternative infrastructure improvements. Provide funding match for equipment and infrastructure to support the reduction of operating costs for various transit authorities across this CommonwealthProject Allocation 5,000,000(b) Rural and intercity rail.--Additional capital projects in the category of transportation assistance projects for rural 20260SB1174PN1455 - 292 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and intercity rail service projects to be constructed or with respect to which an interest is to be acquired by the Department of Transportation, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) (Reserved)(c) Air transportation.--Additional capital projects in the category of transportation assistance projects for air transportation service to which an interest is to be acquired by the Department of Transportation, it successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) (Reserved)Section 6. (Reserved).Section 7. Itemization of flood control projects.Additional capital projects in the category of flood control projects to be constructed by the Department of Environmental Protection, its successors or assigns and to be financed by the incurring of debt are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated costs, as follows:ProjectTotal ProjectAllocation(1) Department of Environmental Protection(i) Core Creek Dam, Bucks County(A) Rehabilitation project20260SB1174PN1455 - 293 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation 3,300,000(ii) Thatcher Run Dam, Crawford County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 850,000(iii) Rainbow Dam, Crawford County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 1,000,000(iv) Kintz Creek Dam, Pike County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 850,000(v) Hamilton Dam, Tioga County(A) Rehabilitation projectProject Allocation 3,900,000(2) (Reserved)Section 8. Itemization of Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission capital projects.Capital projects in the category of public improvement projects to be acquired or developed by the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission and to be financed by the incurring of debt or by the current revenues of the Fish Fund and the Boat Fund pursuant to executive authorizations are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated costs, as follows:ProjectTotal Project Allocation(1) Fish and Boat Commission(i) Fisheries Area 6 Office, Bucks County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace an office and storage facility for fisheries and related operations20260SB1174PN1455 - 294 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Project Allocation3,000,000(ii) Bellefonte State Fish Hatchery, Centre County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation5,000,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a pedestrian bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities, and appurtenancesProject Allocation1,600,000(iii) Benner Spring State Fish Hatchery, Centre County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation5,000,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities, and appurtenancesProject Allocation3,400,000(iv) Pleasant Gap State Fish Hatchery, Centre 20260SB1174PN1455 - 295 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation7,500,000(v) Spring Creek Canyon Trail, Centre County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a two-lane bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation2,800,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate, remove or replace a pedestrian bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities, and appurtenancesProject Allocation500,000(C) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a one-lane bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities, and appurtenancesProject Allocation2,200,000(vi) Kahle Lake, Clarion and Venango Counties (A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 296 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation2,000,000(vii) Tylersville State Fish Hatchery, Clinton County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation8,000,000(viii) Huntsdale State Fish Hatchery, Cumberland County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation26,500,000(B) Design, permit and construct facilities for the remediation of PCB contaminated soils and monitor environmental remediationsProject Allocation7,500,000(ix) Lake Erie State Fish Hatchery, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties to construct fish rearing and research 20260SB1174PN1455 - 297 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructure for the acquisition and development of the Lake Erie State Fish Hatchery, or for the expansion and development of another fish rearing facility in Erie CountyProject Allocation25,000,000(x) North East Marina, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct new or rehabilitate existing infrastructure to support a day use/seasonal public access area and boat launchProject Allocation18,000,000(xi) Trout Run Steel Head Collection Facility, Erie County(A) Design, permit, construct, rehabilitate or improve fish collection facilities and related infrastructure and demolition of existing in-stream concrete structures, retaining walls and related infrastructureProject Allocation 7,000,000(xii) Union City Aquatic Conservancy Center, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, 20260SB1174PN1455 - 298 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation 10,000,000(xiii) Walnut Creek Marina, Erie County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct or rehabilitate marina-related infrastructure to improve slip capacity, parking and boating and fishing accessProject Allocation12,000,000(xiv) Maintenance Area 1/Fisheries Area 2 Office, Forest County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace an office and storage facility for fisheries and related operationsProject Allocation3,000,000(xv) Tionesta State Fish Hatchery, Forest County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation5,000,000(xvi) Hemlock Lake, Indiana County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 299 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary, at Hemlock LakeProject Allocation2,000,000(xvii) Cloe Lake, Jefferson County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation8,500,000(xviii) Fords Lake, Lackawanna County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation2,000,000(xix) Harris Pond, Luzerne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as 20260SB1174PN1455 - 300 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessaryProject Allocation2,000,000(xx) Minsi Lake, Northampton County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities, and appurtenancesProject Allocation5,200,000(xxi) Oswayo State Fish Hatchery, Potter County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation6,500,000(xxii) High Point Lake, Somerset County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary, at High Point LakeProject Allocation2,000,000(xxiii) Hunters Lake, Sullivan County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 301 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessaryProject Allocation1,500,000(xxiv) Fisheries Area 5 Office, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace an office and storage facility for fisheries and related operationsProject Allocation3,000,000(xxv) Miller Pond, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary at Miller PondProject Allocation1,500,000(xxvi) Pleasant Mount State Fish Hatchery, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct fish rearing facilities, buildings, effluent treatment, influent treatment and related infrastructureProject Allocation9,500,000(B) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace 20260SB1174PN1455 - 302 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bridges, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation5,600,000(C) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or replace a pedestrian bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities and appurtenancesProject Allocation1,600,000(xxvii) White Oak Pond, Wayne County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct a dam rehabilitation project, including repair and replacement of amenities, appurtenances, ADA accessibility and sediment removal operations as necessary at White Oak PondProject Allocation1,500,000(xxviii) Polk/Sandy Creek bridge removal, Venango County(A) Design, permit, acquire properties and construct, rehabilitate or remove an abandoned railroad bridge, including repair and replacement of amenities, and appurtenancesProject Allocation1,500,000(2) (Reserved)Section 9. Itemization of Manufacturing Fund capital projects.Capital projects in the category of public improvement 20260SB1174PN1455 - 303 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 projects to be acquired or developed by the Department of General Services, its successors and assigns, for the Department of Corrections and to be financed from current revenues of the Manufacturing Fund are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated costs, as follows:ProjectTotal Project Allocation(1) Department of Corrections(i) Correctional Industries at Benner, Centre County(A) New concrete batch plant at State Correctional Institution BennerProject Allocation 10,000,000(ii) Correctional Industries at Houtzdale, Clearfield County(A) Study for concrete batch plant at State Correctional Institution HoutzdaleProject Allocation 75,000Section 10. Itemization of critical infrastructure investment projects.Additional capital projects in the category of critical infrastructure investment projects to be acquired or constructed by the Office of the Budget, its successors or assigns, and to be financed by the incurring of debt, are hereby itemized, together with their respective estimated financial costs, as follows:ProjectTotal Project Allocation(1) Critical Infrastructure Investments20260SB1174PN1455 - 304 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Statewide Improvements(A) Site preparation, demolition, renovation, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, abatement and removal of hazardous materials/machinery/infrastructure/ equipment, utility work and other related costs for projects undertaken by schools, local educational institutions, general or limited purpose units of local government, or any units of local government created by joint action of two or more local government unitsProject Allocation 1,000,000,000Section 11. Debt authorization.(a) Public improvements.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(a).(b) Furniture and equipment.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(b) as may be found necessary to carry out the acquisition and 20260SB1174PN1455 - 305 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction of the public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition of original movable furniture and equipment specifically itemized in the capital budget.(c) Transportation assistance.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(c) as may be found necessary to carry out the acquisition and construction of the transportation assistance projects specifically itemized in a capital budget.(d) (Reserved).(e) Flood control.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum specified in section 2(e) as may be found necessary to carry out the acquisition and construction of the flood control projects specifically itemized in a capital budget.(f) Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission projects.--The Governor, Auditor General and State Treasurer are hereby authorized and directed to borrow from time to time in addition to any authorization heretofore or hereafter enacted, on the credit of the Commonwealth, subject to the limitations provided in the current capital budget, money not exceeding in the aggregate specified in section 2(f) to carry out the acquisition and construction of the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission 20260SB1174PN1455 - 306 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 projects specifically itemized in a capital budget.Section 12. Issue of bonds.The indebtedness authorized in this act shall be incurred from time to time and shall be evidenced by one or more series of general obligation bonds of the Commonwealth in such aggregate principal amount for each series as the Governor, the Auditor General and the State Treasurer shall determine, but the latest stated maturity date shall not exceed the estimated useful life of the projects being financed as stated in section 13.Section 13. Estimated useful life and term of debt.(a) Estimated useful life.--The General Assembly states that the estimated useful life of the capital projects itemized in this act is as follows:(1) Public improvement projects, 30 years.(2) Furniture and equipment, 10 years.(3) Transportation assistance projects:(i) Rolling stock, 15 years.(ii) Passenger buses, 12 years.(iii) Furniture and equipment, 10 years.(iv) All others, 30 years.(4) (Reserved).(b) Term of debt.--The maximum term of the debt authorized to be incurred under this act is 30 years.Section 14. Appropriations.(a) Public improvements.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of General Services in the maximum amount specified in section 2(a) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the 20260SB1174PN1455 - 307 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public improvement projects specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of General Services the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.(b) Furniture and equipment.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of General Services in the maximum amount specified in section 2(b) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the public improvement projects consisting of the acquisition of original movable furniture and equipment specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of General Services the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.(c) Transportation assistance.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of Transportation in the maximum amount specified in section 2(c) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the transportation assistance projects specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of Transportation the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.(d) (Reserved).(e) Flood control.--The net proceeds of the sale of the obligations authorized in this act are hereby appropriated from the Capital Facilities Fund to the Department of Environmental 20260SB1174PN1455 - 308 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Protection in the maximum amount specified in section 2(e) to be used by it exclusively to defray the financial cost of the flood control projects specifically itemized in a capital budget. After reserving or paying the expenses of the sale of the obligation, the State Treasurer shall pay to the Department of Environmental Protection the money as required and certified by it to be legally due and payable.Section 15. Federal funds.(a) Projects itemized in this act.--All money received from the Federal Government for the projects specifically itemized in this act are also hereby appropriated for those projects.(b) Projects not requiring itemization.--Department of Military and Veterans Affairs construction projects which are totally federally funded and to be administered by the Department of General Services are hereby authorized.Section 16. Editorial changes.In editing and preparing this act for printing following the final enactment, the Legislative Reference Bureau shall insert or revise letters or numbers for projects where the letters or numbers are missing or require revision. The Legislative Reference Bureau shall also revise the total monetary amounts for the total authorization, debt authorization, appropriations and department totals as necessary to agree with the total monetary amounts of the projects.Section 17. Delegation.Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department of General Services may delegate the design and construction of the projects contained in:(1) Section 3(1)(i) of this act to The Pennsylvania State University.20260SB1174PN1455 - 309 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Section 3(1)(iii) of this act to the University of Pennsylvania.(3) Section 3(a)(1)(ii)(B) of the act of November 1, 2013 (P.L.680, No.85), known as the Capital Budget Project Itemization Act of 2013-2014, to the University of Pennsylvania.Section 18. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1174PN1455 - 310 - 12345678